es: Tamaño de la bandeja de mesa de vapor: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Total; Otros
vi: Kích thước khay hâm nóng: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Toàn bộ; Khác
da: Gastrobakkestørrelse: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Fuldt; Andet
de: Größe des Behälters für Warmhaltetheken: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Vollständig; Sonstiges
nl: Grootte van stoomtafelpan: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Volledig; Overig
fr: Taille du bac gastronorme: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Complet; Autre
cs: Velikost nádoby pro chafing: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; 1/1 (plná velikost); Jiné
sv: Storlek för ångbordspanna: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Full; Annat
ru: Размер гастроемкости для столов-мармитов: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Полноразмерная; Другая
bg-BG: Размер на съда за топла витрина: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Пълно; Друго
ja: スチームテーブルパンのサイズ: 1/2サイズ; 1/3サイズ; 1/4サイズ; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3サイズ; 2/4サイズ; フル; その他
tr: Buharlı pişirme tavası boyutu: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Tam boy; Diğer
hu: Gőzölő tálca mérete: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Teljes; Egyéb
ko: 스팀 테이블 팬 규격: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; 전체; 기타
zh-CN: 蒸汽台托盘尺寸: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; 全尺寸; 其他
pt-BR: Tamanho da panela da mesa térmica: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Completa; Outro
it: Dimensioni della pentola a vapore: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Pieno; Altro
en: Steam table pan size: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Full; Other
fi: Höyrypöydän pannun koko: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Täysi; Muu
th: ขนาดของอ่างใส่อาหาร: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; ทั้งหมด; อื่นๆ
pl: Rozmiar wkładu do podgrzewacza żywności: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Pełne; Inne
sl-SI: Velikost parne namizne posode: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Polna; Druga
sk-SK: Veľkosť gastronádoby: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Plná; Iné
ro-RO: Mărimea tăvii pentru bain-marie: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Standard; Altele
pt-PT: Tamanho da panela da mesa a vapor: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Completo; Outro
hr-HR: Veličina posude za grijaće stolove: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Puni; Ostalo
nb: Størrelse på dampbordpanne: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Full; Annet
lt-LT: Šildomo maisto indo dydis: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Įprastas; Kita
zh-TW: 蒸氣台餐盤尺寸: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; 全尺寸; 其他
el: Μέγεθος δοχείου bain-marie: 1/2; 1/3; 1/4; 1/6; 1/9; 2/1; 2/3; 2/4; Πλήρους μεγέθους; Άλλο